de: Funktionsumfang des Kassettendecks: Anti-Roll-Mechanismus; Automatischer Auswurf; Auto-Reverse; Auto-Stopp; Dolby-NR-Taste; Schneller Vor-/Rücklauf; Titelsuchlauf/Leerstellensprung; Programmierbarer Titelsuchlauf; Wiederholte Wiedergabe; Bandarten-Wahlschalter (Normal/Chrom/Metal); Sonstiges
da: Funktioner i kassettebåndoptager: Anti-rulle-mekanisme; Automatisk udskubning; Auto-reverse; Auto-stop; Dolby NR-knap; Spol frem/tilbage; Musiksøgning/Spring over tomme passager; Programmerbar sporsøgning; Gentag afspilning; Valg af båndtype (Normal/Krom/Metal); Andet
ru: Набор функций кассетной деки: Механизм защиты от замятия пленки; Автовыброс; Автореверс; Автостоп; Кнопка Dolby NR; Перемотка вперед/назад; Поиск музыки / пропуск пауз; Программируемый поиск треков; Повтор воспроизведения; Переключатель типа ленты (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Другое
en: Cassette deck feature set: Anti-roll mechanism; Auto-eject; Auto-reverse; Auto-stop; Dolby NR button; Fast forward/rewind; Music search/blank skip; Programmable track search; Repeat playback; Tape type selector (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Other
sl-SI: Nabor funkcij kasetnega predvajalnika: Mehanizem proti navijanju traku; Samodejni izmet; Avtorevers; Samodejna zaustavitev; Gumb Dolby NR; Hitro previjanje naprej/nazaj; Iskanje glasbe / preskok tišine; Programirljivo iskanje posnetkov; Ponavljanje predvajanja; Izbirnik vrste traku (navadni/kromirani/kovinski); Drugo
el: Σύνολο λειτουργιών κασέτας: Μηχανισμός anti-roll; Αυτόματη εξαγωγή; Αυτόματη αναστροφή; Αυτόματη διακοπή; Κουμπί Dolby NR; Γρήγορη προώθηση/επαναφορά; Αναζήτηση μουσικής/παράλειψη κενών; Προγραμματιζόμενη αναζήτηση κομματιών; Επανάληψη αναπαραγωγής; Επιλογέας τύπου κασέτας (Κανονική/Χρωμίου/Μετάλλου); Άλλο
th: ชุดคุณสมบัติของเครื่องเล่นเทปคาสเซ็ตต์: กลไกกันเทปพัน; คายตลับอัตโนมัติ; เล่นสลับหน้าอัตโนมัติ; หยุดอัตโนมัติ; ปุ่ม Dolby NR; กรอเดินหน้า/ถอยหลัง; ค้นหาเพลง/ข้ามช่องว่าง; ค้นหาแทร็กแบบตั้งโปรแกรมได้; เล่นซ้ำ; ตัวเลือกประเภทเทป (Normal/Chrome/Metal); อื่นๆ
cs: Sada funkcí kazetového magnetofonu: Mechanismus proti namotání pásky; Automatické vysunutí; Auto-reverse; Automatické zastavení; Tlačítko Dolby NR; Rychlé přetáčení vpřed/vzad; Vyhledávání hudby / přeskočení prázdného místa; Programovatelné vyhledávání skladeb; Opakované přehrávání; Přepínač typu pásky (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Jiné
bg-BG: Набор от функции на касетния дек: Механизъм против навиване; Автоматично изваждане; Автореверс; Автостоп; Бутон за Dolby NR; Бързо превъртане напред/назад; Търсене на музика/прескачане на празни места; Програмируемо търсене на песни; Повторно възпроизвеждане; Селектор за типа на лентата (нормална/хромирана/метална); Други
ro-RO: Set de funcții pentru casete audio: Mecanism anti-rulare; Scoatere automată (Auto-eject); Auto-revers; Auto-stop; Buton Dolby NR; Derulare rapidă înainte/înapoi; Căutare muzică/sărire spații goale; Căutare programabilă a pieselor; Repetare redare; Selector tip bandă (Normal/Crom/Metal); Altele
pl: Zestaw funkcji magnetofonu kasetowego: Mechanizm anti-roll; Automatyczne wysuwanie; Auto-reverse; Auto-stop; Przycisk Dolby NR; Szybkie przewijanie do przodu/tyłu; Wyszukiwanie utworów / pomijanie pustych miejsc; Programowalne wyszukiwanie utworów; Powtarzanie odtwarzania; Wybór typu taśmy (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Inne
vi: Bộ tính năng của đầu phát băng cassette: Cơ chế chống cuộn băng; Tự động đẩy ra; Đảo chiều tự động; Tự động dừng; Nút Dolby NR; Tua đi/tua lại; Tìm nhạc/bỏ qua đoạn trống; Tìm bài hát có thể lập trình; Lặp lại; Bộ chọn loại băng (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Khác
sk-SK: Sada funkcií kazetového prehrávača: Mechanizmus proti namotávaniu pásky; Automatické vysunutie; Auto-reverse; Automatické zastavenie; Tlačidlo Dolby NR; Rýchle pretáčanie vpred/vzad; Vyhľadávanie hudby/preskočenie prázdneho miesta; Programovateľné vyhľadávanie skladieb; Opakované prehrávanie; Volič typu pásky (normálna/chróm/kov); Iné
pt-PT: Conjunto de recursos do leitor de cassetes: Mecanismo antirrolamento; Ejeção automática; Inversão automática; Paragem automática; Botão Dolby NR; Avanço rápido/rebobinagem; Pesquisa de música/saltar espaços em branco; Pesquisa de faixas programável; Repetição da reprodução; Seletor de tipo de fita (Normal/Cromo/Metal); Outro
hr-HR: Skup značajki kasetofona: Mehanizam protiv namatanja trake; Automatsko izbacivanje; Auto-reverse; Automatsko zaustavljanje; Gumb Dolby NR; Brzo premotavanje unaprijed / unatrag; Pretraživanje glazbe / preskakanje praznine; Programabilno pretraživanje zapisa; Ponavljanje reprodukcije; Birač vrste trake (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Ostalo
sv: Funktioner för kassettdäck: Anti-rullmekanism; Automatisk utmatning; Auto-reverse; Autostopp; Dolby NR-knapp; Snabbspolning framåt/bakåt; Musiksökning/hoppa över tystnad; Programmerbar spårsökning; Upprepa uppspelning; Bandtypsväljare (normal/krom/metall); Övrigt
zh-CN: 卡式磁带播放器功能配置: 防卷带机制; 自动弹出; 自动翻带; 自动停止; 杜比降噪按钮; 快进/快退; 音乐搜索/跳过空白; 可编程曲目搜索; 重复播放; 磁带类型选择器（普通/铬/金属）; 其他
hu: Kazettás magnó funkciókészlete: Szalagbegyűrődés-gátló mechanizmus; Automatikus kiadás; Automatikus irányváltás; Automatikus leállítás; Dolby NR gomb; Gyors előre/hátra tekerés; Zenekeresés / Üres rész átugrása; Programozható számkeresés; Lejátszás ismétlése; Szalagtípus-választó (Normál/Króm/Metál); Egyéb
fi: Kasettisoittimen ominaisuusjoukko: Rullautumisenestomekanismi; Automaattinen poisto; Automaattinen suunnanvaihto; Automaattinen pysäytys; Dolby NR -painike; Pikakelaus eteen/taakse; Musiikin haku / tyhjän ohitus; Ohjelmoitava raitahaku; Uudelleentoisto; Nauhatyypin valitsin (Normal/Chrome/Metal); Muu
ja: カセットデッキの機能セット: アンチロール機構; オートエジェクト; オートリバース; オートストップ; ドルビーNRボタン; 早送り/巻き戻し; 頭出し/ブランクスキップ; プログラム選曲; リピート再生; テープセレクター (ノーマル/クローム/メタル); その他
it: Set di funzioni del registratore a cassette: Meccanismo antiavvolgimento; Espulsione automatica; Inversione automatica; Arresto automatico; Pulsante Dolby NR; Avanti/indietro veloce; Ricerca brano/salto spazio vuoto; Ricerca brano programmabile; Ripetizione riproduzione; Selettore tipo nastro (Normale/Cromo/Metallo); Altro
fr: Fonctions du lecteur de cassettes: Mécanisme anti-roulement; Éjection automatique; Inversion automatique; Arrêt automatique; Bouton Dolby NR; Avance/retour rapide; Recherche de musique/saut de blanc; Recherche de piste programmable; Répétition de lecture; Sélecteur de type de bande (normale/chrome/métal); Autre
nl: Cassettedeck functies: Anti-roll-mechanisme; Auto-eject; Auto-reverse; Auto-stop; Dolby NR-knop; Vooruitspoelen/terugspoelen; Muziek zoeken/blanco overslaan; Programmeerbaar nummers zoeken; Herhaald afspelen; Bandtypeselector (Normaal/Chroom/Metal); Overig
ko: 카세트 데크 기능 구성: 안티 롤 메커니즘; 오토 이젝트; 자동 리버스; 자동 정지; Dolby NR 버튼; 빨리 감기/되감기; 음악 검색/공백 건너뛰기; 프로그래밍 가능 트랙 검색; 반복 재생; 테이프 유형 선택기(노멀/크롬/메탈); 기타
tr: Kaset çalar özellik seti: Bant sarma önleyici mekanizma; Otomatik çıkarma; Otomatik ters çevirme; Otomatik durdurma; Dolby NR düğmesi; Hızlı ileri/geri sarma; Müzik arama/boşluk atlama; Programlanabilir parça arama; Tekrar çalma; Kaset türü seçici (Normal/Krom/Metal); Diğer
pt-BR: Conjunto de recursos do cassete: Mecanismo antienrolamento; Ejeção automática; Autorreverso; Parada automática; Botão Dolby NR; Avanço rápido/retrocesso; Busca de música/pulo de espaço em branco; Busca de faixa programável; Reprodução repetida; Seletor de tipo de fita (Normal/Cromo/Metal); Outros
nb: Kassettspillerfunksjoner: Antirullemekanisme; Automatisk utløsing; Autorevers; Autostopp; Dolby NR-knapp; Spol frem/tilbake; Musikksøk / hopp over tomrom; Programmerbart sporsøk; Gjenta avspilling; Båndtypevelger (Normal/krom/metall); Annet
es: Conjunto de funciones de la casetera: Mecanismo antienrollamiento; Expulsión automática; Autorreversa; Parada automática; Botón Dolby NR; Avance rápido/rebobinado; Búsqueda de música/salto de espacios en blanco; Búsqueda de pistas programable; Repetición de reproducción; Selector de tipo de cinta (Normal/Cromo/Metal); Otro
zh-TW: 卡式錄音座功能組: 防捲帶機制; 自動退帶; 自動翻面; 自動停止; Dolby NR 按鈕; 快轉/倒轉; 音樂搜尋/跳過空白; 可編程曲目搜尋; 重複播放; 磁帶類型選擇 (Normal/Chrome/Metal); 其他
lt-LT: Kasetinio grotuvo funkcijų rinkinys: Apsaugos nuo juostos susukimo mechanizmas; Automatinis išmetimas; Automatinis reversas; Automatinis stabdymas; „Dolby NR“ mygtukas; Greitas persukimas pirmyn / atgal; Muzikos paieška / tuščios vietos praleidimas; Programuojama takelių paieška; Pakartotinis atkūrimas; Juostelės tipo parinkiklis (Normali / Chromo / Metalinė); Kita